Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB99.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 41 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Bullion depository" means an entity providing vault facilities within the
United States for the storage of gold bullion and silver bullion that:
1. Complies with the prescribed London Bullion Market Association or
equivalent best practice guidelines; and
2. Provides accounts that:
a. Hold gold bullion and silver bullion; and
Page 1 of 18
XXXX 1/13/2026 9:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1276
b. Allow account holders to buy, sell, save, and spend gold bullion
and silver bullion;
(b) "Depository agent" means a private entity authorized by the State Treasurer
to operate a bullion depository or perform related services under this
section;
(c) "Electronic payment system" means an electronic platform or payment
system that enables participating vendors to receive and process a payment
from an account holder of a bullion depository using gold specie and silver
specie held in the bullion depository as the basis for the payment
transaction;
(d) "Gold bullion" and "silver bullion":
1. Means, as applicable, refined precious gold or silver metal that is:
a. In any shape or form; and
b. Valued primarily based on its metal content and not on its form
or function; and
2. Includes, as applicable, gold coin and silver coin;
(e) "Gold coin" and "silver coin" means, as applicable, gold or silver metal
that is:
1. In bars or other physical forms certified at least:
a. For gold metal, ninety-nine and one-half percent (99.5%) pure;
and
b. For silver metal, ninety-nine and nine-tenths percent (99.9%)
pure; and
2. Coined, stamped, or imprinted with its weight and purity;
(f) "Gold specie" and "silver specie" means, as applicable, gold or silver
bullion that:
1. Has intrinsic value; and
Page 2 of 18
XXXX 1/13/2026 9:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1276
2. Is used or intended for use as money;
(g) "Governing authority":
1. Means any government, agency, authority, board, bureau,
commission, committee, council, department, government corporation,
institution, legislative body, political subdivision, instrumentality, or
other entity of this state; and
2. Includes:
a. Any city, county, charter county government, urban-county
government, consolidated local government, unified local
government, public school district, public institution of
education, special district, or municipal corporation of this state;
and
b. Any government, agency, authority, board, bureau, department,
commission, council, committee, instrumentality, or other entity
of an entity referenced in subdivision a. of this subparagraph;
(h) "Legal tender" means a recognized medium of exchange for the payment of
debts, taxes, fees, and other obligations;
(i) "Person" includes:
1. A natural person;
2. Any type or form of corporation, company, partnership,
proprietorship, association, or other legal entity; and
3. A government, governmental subdivision or agency, governing
authority, or other body politic; and
(j) "Social credit scoring system" means a system of recordkeeping, data
collection, or scoring that:
1. Evaluates, monitors, or ranks an individual's or entity's behavior,
beliefs, associations, or compliance with government or corporate
Page 3 of 18
XXXX 1/13/2026 9:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1276
standards; and
2. Conditions access to services, benefits, or opportunities based on an
evaluation, monitoring, or ranking referenced in subparagraph 1. of
this paragraph.
(2) (a) Subject to paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, gold specie and silver
specie are recognized as legal tender by the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(b) Gold specie or silver specie may be used for the payment of:
1. Debts between private parties, if the parties mutually agree to use of
the specie; and
2. Taxes, fees, or other obligations owed to the Commonwealth of
Kentucky or a governing authority, if the Commonwealth of Kentucky
or governing authority agrees to accept the specie as payment.
(c) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a person shall not be
required to accept gold specie or silver specie as payment.
(3) Subject to subsections (4) and (9) of this section, the State Treasurer:
(a) Shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A:
1. To designate or establish a bullion depository for the secure storage of
gold bullion and silver bullion to facilitate transactions under this
section;
2. To authorize and approve one (1) or more electronic payment systems
to facilitate transactions under this section; and
3. That are otherwise necessary to implement this section; and
(b) May:
1. Operate the bullion depository directly or contract with a depository
agent; and
2. Contract with one (1) or more private entities to develop or operate
Page 4 of 18
XXXX 1/13/2026 9:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1276
any electronic payment system.
(4) The administrative regulations promulgated by the State Treasurer under
subsection (3) of this section shall establish requirements for ensuring:
(a) The designated or established bullion depository is:
1. Secure;
2. Transparent to account holders; and
3. Accessible for use by any person;
(b) Each authorized and approved electronic payment system:
1. Is reliable; and
2. Complies with applicable state and federal laws, including this section
and any lawful administrative regulations promulgated under this
section;
(c) That any depository agent or contracted entity operates in the best interests
of the Commonwealth of Kentucky and the account holders of the
designated or established bullion depository;
(d) With respect to the designated or established bullion depository, that the
following is regularly verified:
1. The gold bullion and silver bullion held by the depository; and
2. Compliance with this section by the depository, including any lawful
administrative regulations promulgated under this section;
(e) That each authorized and approved electronic payment system and any
participating vendors are:
1. Authorized to do business in this state; and
2. Compliant with state and federal money transmitter laws;
(f) That appropriate fraud prevention measures are implemented by:
1. The designated or established bullion depository;
2. Any depository agent or contracted entity;
Page 5 of 18
XXXX 1/13/2026 9:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1276
3. Each authorized and approved electronic payment system; and
4. Each participating vendor of an authorized and approved electronic
payment system; and
(g) 1. The privacy of the bullion depository's account holders and the
participants of each authorized and approved electronic payment
system, which shall include, at a minimum, that transaction
information shall not, except to the extent the State Treasurer deems
necessary to enforce and effectuate this section, be:
a. Shared with any person other than the account holder or
participant without proper court authorization; or
b. Used in any sort of social credit scoring system implemented or
maintained by the United States, a state of the United States, a
foreign country or jurisdiction, an intergovernmental
organization, or any government, agency, agent, instrumentality,
central bank, or other entity thereof.
2. a. The United States, a state of the United States, a foreign country
or jurisdiction, an intergovernmental organization, or any
government, agency, agent, instrumentality, central bank, or
other entity thereof shall not use an account holder's or
participant's transaction information in violation of
subparagraph 1.b. of this paragraph.
b. Any account holder or participant aggrieved by a violation of
subdivision a. of this subparagraph shall have a cause of action
against the alleged violator in any court of competent
jurisdiction to obtain all appropriate relief, which shall include,
without limitation:
i. Injunctive relief;
Page 6 of 18
XXXX 1/13/2026 9:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1276
ii. Declaratory relief;
iii. Compensatory damages;
iv. Costs; and
v. Attorney's fees.
(5) A bullion depository designated or established by the State Treasurer under this
section shall have a contractual relationship with each electronic payment system
that is authorized and approved by the State Treasurer under this section to
provide services for deposits of gold bullion and silver bullion as provided by the
State Treasurer under this section.
(6) For each deposit made in a bullion depository designated or established by the
State Treasurer under this section, the bullion depository shall insure the deposit
under an all-risk insurance policy issued by a nongovernmental operated insurer
for one hundred percent (100%) of the full replacement value of the deposit.
(7) A deposit made in a bullion depository designated or established by the State
Treasurer under this section shall:
(a) Be the sole property of the account holder; and
(b) Not be subject to appropriation by any state or the United States without due
process of law.
(8) By July 1 of each year, the State Treasurer shall submit an annual written report
to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the appropriate interim
joint committees or other appropriate committees that details the following:
(a) The status and operations of the designated or established bullion
depository;
(b) The implementation and usage of authorized and approved electronic
payment systems; and
(c) The economic impact of recognizing gold specie and silver specie as legal
tender.
Page 7 of 18
XXXX 1/13/2026 9:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1276
(9) The State Treasurer shall implement this section within one (1) year of the
effective date of this section.
(10) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize, endorse, create, or
implement:
(a) A central bank digital currency; or
(b) Any mechanism for surveillance, social credit scoring, or behavioral
conditioning, or any other form of social or economic control, by the
Commonwealth of Kentucky or a governing authority.
Section 2. KRS 141.019 is amended to read as follows:
In the case of taxpayers other than corporations:
(1) Adjusted gross income shall be calculated by subtracting from the gross income of
those taxpayers the deductions allowed individuals by Section 62 of the Internal
Revenue Code and adjusting as follows:
(a) Exclude income that is exempt from state taxation by the Kentucky
Constitution and the Constitution and statutory laws of the United States;
(b) Exclude income from supplemental annuities provided by the Railroad
Retirement Act of 1937 as amended and which are subject to federal income
tax by Pub. L. No. 89-699;
(c) Include interest income derived from obligations of sister states and political
subdivisions thereof;
(d) Exclude employee pension contributions picked up as provided for in KRS
6.505, 16.545, 21.360, 61.523, 61.560, 65.155, 67A.320, 67A.510, 78.610,
and 161.540 upon a ruling by the Internal Revenue Service or the federal
courts that these contributions shall not be included as gross income until such
time as the contributions are distributed or made available to the employee;
(e) Exclude Social Security and railroad retirement benefits subject to federal
income tax;
Page 8 of 18
XXXX 1/13/2026 9:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1276
(f) Exclude any money received because of a settlement or judgment in a lawsuit
brought against a manufacturer or distributor of "Agent Orange" for damages
resulting from exposure to Agent Orange by a member or veteran of the
Armed Forces of the United States or any dependent of such person who
served in Vietnam;
(g) 1. a. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2005, but before
January 1, 2018, exclude up to forty-one thousand one hundred ten
dollars ($41,110) of total distributions from pension plans, annuity
contracts, profit-sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee
savings plans; and
b. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, exclude
up to thirty-one thousand one hundred ten dollars ($31,110) of
total distributions from pension plans, annuity contracts, profit-
sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee savings plans.
2. As used in this paragraph:
a. "Annuity contract" has the same meaning as set forth in Section
1035 of the Internal Revenue Code;
b. "Distributions" includes but is not limited to any lump-sum
distribution from pension or profit-sharing plans qualifying for the
income tax averaging provisions of Section 402 of the Internal
Revenue Code; any distribution from an individual retirement
account as defined in Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code;
and any disability pension distribution; and
c. "Pension plans, profit-sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee
savings plans" means any trust or other entity created or organized
under a written retirement plan and forming part of a stock bonus,
pension, or profit-sharing plan of a public or private employer for
Page 9 of 18
XXXX 1/13/2026 9:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1276
the exclusive benefit of employees or their beneficiaries and
includes plans qualified or unqualified under Section 401 of the
Internal Revenue Code and individual retirement accounts as
defined in Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(h) 1. a. Exclude the portion of the distributive share of a shareholder's net
income from an S corporation subject to the franchise tax imposed
under KRS 136.505 or the capital stock tax imposed under KRS
136.300; and
b. Exclude the portion of the distributive share of a shareholder's net
income from an S corporation related to a qualified subchapter S
subsidiary subject to the franchise tax imposed under KRS
136.505 or the capital stock tax imposed under KRS 136.300.
2. The shareholder's basis of stock held in an S corporation where the S
corporation or its qualified subchapter S subsidiary is subject to the
franchise tax imposed under KRS 136.505 or the capital stock tax
imposed under KRS 136.300 shall be the same as the basis for federal
income tax purposes;
(i) Exclude income received for services performed as a precinct worker for
election training or for working at election booths in state, county, and local
primaries or regular or special elections;
(j) Exclude any capital gains income attributable to property taken by eminent
domain;
(k) 1. Exclude all income from all sources for members of the Armed Forces
who are on active duty and who are killed in the line of duty, for the
year during which the death occurred and the year prior to the year
during which the death occurred.
2. For the purposes of this paragraph, "all income from all sources" shall
Page 10 of 18
XXXX 1/13/2026 9:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1276
include all federal and state death benefits payable to the estate or any
beneficiaries;
(l) Exclude all military pay received by members of the Armed Forces while on
active duty;
(m) 1. Include the amount deducted for depreciation under 26 U.S.C. sec. 167
or 168; and
2. Exclude the amounts allowed by KRS 141.0101 for depreciation;
(n) Include the amount deducted under 26 U.S.C. sec. 199A;
(o) Ignore any change in the cost basis of the surviving spouse's share of property
owned by a Kentucky community property trust occurring for federal income
tax purposes as a result of the death of the predeceasing spouse;
(p) Allow the same treatment allowed under Pub. L. No. 116-260, secs. 276 and
278, related to the tax treatment of forgiven covered loans, deductions
attributable to those loans, and tax attributes associated with those loans for
taxable years ending on or after March 27, 2020, but before January 1, 2022;
[and]
(q) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, but before March 11,
2023, allow the same treatment of restaurant revitalization grants in
accordance with Pub. L. No. 117-2, sec. 9673 and 15 U.S.C. sec. 9009c,
related to the tax treatment of the grants, deductions attributable to those
grants, and tax attributes associated with those grants; and
(r) Ignore any capital gains and losses attributable to the sale or exchange of
gold specie and silver specie as defined in Section 1 of this Act; and
(2) Net income shall be calculated by subtracting from adjusted gross income all the
deductions allowed individuals by Chapter 1 of the Internal Revenue Code, as
modified by KRS 141.0101, except:
(a) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 164 for taxes;
Page 11 of 18
XXXX 1/13/2026 9:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1276
(b) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 165 for losses, except wagering
losses allowed under Section 165(d) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(c) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 213 for medical care expenses;
(d) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 217 for moving expenses;
(e) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 67 for any other miscellaneous
deduction;
(f) Any deduction allowed by the Internal Revenue Code for amounts allowable
under KRS 140.090(1)(h) in calculating the value of the distributive shares of
the estate of a decedent, unless there is filed with the income return a
statement that the deduction has not been claimed under KRS 140.090(1)(h);
(g) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 151 for personal exemptions and
any other deductions in lieu thereof;
(h) Any deduction allowed for amounts paid to any club, organization, or
establishment which has been determined by the courts or an agency
established by the General Assembly and charged with enforcing the civil
rights laws of the Commonwealth, not to afford full and equal membership
and full and equal enjoyment of its goods, services, facilities, privileges,
advantages, or accommodations to any person because of race, color, religion,
national origin, or sex, except nothing shall be construed to deny a deduction
for amounts paid to any religious or denominational club, group, or
establishment or any organization operated solely for charitable or educational
purposes which restricts membership to persons of the same religion or
denomination in order to promote the religious principles for which it is
established and maintained; and
(i) A taxpayer may elect to claim the standard deduction allowed by KRS
141.081 instead of itemized deductions allowed pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 63
and as modified by this section.
Page 12 of 18
XXXX 1/13/2026 9:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1276
Section 3. KRS 141.039 is amended to read as follows:
In the case of corporations:
(1) Gross income shall be calculated by adjusting federal gross income as defined in
Section 61 of the Internal Revenue Code as follows:
(a) Exclude income that is exempt from state taxation by the Kentucky
Constitution and the Constitution and statutory laws of the United States;
(b) Exclude all dividend income;
(c) Include interest income derived from obligations of sister states and political
subdivisions thereof;
(d) Exclude fifty percent (50%) of gross income derived from any disposal of
coal covered by Section 631(c) of the Internal Revenue Code if the
corporation does not claim any deduction for percentage depletion, or for
expenditures attributable to the making and administering of the contract
under which such disposition occurs or to the preservation of the economic
interests retained under such contract;
(e) Include the amount calculated under KRS 141.205;
(f) Ignore the provisions of Section 281 of the Internal Revenue Code in
computing gross income;
(g) Include the amount of deprecation deduction calculated under 26 U.S.C. sec.
167 or 168;
(h) Allow the same treatment allowed under Pub. L. No. 116-260, secs. 276 and
278, related to the tax treatment of forgiven covered loans, deductions
attributable to those loans, and tax attributes associated with those loans for
taxable years ending on or after March 27, 2020, but before January 1, 2022;
[and]
(i) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, but before March 11,
2023, allow the same treatment of restaurant revitalization grants in
Page 13 of 18
XXXX 1/13/2026 9:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1276
accordance with Pub. L. No. 117-2, sec. 9673 and 15 U.S.C. sec. 9009c,
related to the tax treatment of the grants, deductions attributable to those
grants, and tax attributes associated with those grants; and
(j) Ignore any capital gains and losses attributable to the sale or exchange of
gold specie and silver specie as defined in Section 1 of this Act; and
(2) Net income shall be calculated by subtracting from gross income:
(a) The deduction for depreciation allowed by KRS 141.0101;
(b) Any amount paid for vouchers or similar instruments that provide health
insurance coverage to employees or their families;
(c) All the deductions from gross income allowed corporations by Chapter 1 of
the Internal Revenue Code, as modified by KRS 141.0101, except:
1. Any deduction for a state tax which is computed, in whole or in part, by
reference to gross or net income and which is paid or accrued to any
state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth
of Puerto Rico, any territory or possession of the United States, or to any
foreign country or political subdivision thereof;
2. The deductions contained in Sections 243, 245, and 247 of the Internal
Revenue Code;
3. The provisions of Section 281 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be
ignored in computing net income;
4. Any deduction directly or indirectly allocable to income which is either
exempt from taxation or otherwise not taxed under the provisions of this
chapter, except for deductions allowed under Pub. L. No. 116-260, secs.
276 and 278, related to the tax treatment of forgiven covered loans and
deductions attributable to those loans for taxable years ending on or
after March 27, 2020, but before January 1, 2022; and deductions
allowed under Pub. L. No. 117-2, sec. 9673 and 15 U.S.C. sec. 9009c,
Page 14 of 18
XXXX 1/13/2026 9:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1276
related to the tax treatment of restaurant revitalization grants and
deductions attributable to those grants for taxable years beginning on or
after January 1, 2020, but before March 11, 2023. Nothing in this
chapter shall be construed to permit the same item to be deducted more
than once;
5. Any deduction for amounts paid to any club, organization, or
establishment which has been determined by the courts or an agency
established by the General Assembly and charged with enforcing the
civil rights laws of the Commonwealth, not to afford full and equal
membership and full and equal enjoyment of its goods, services,
facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations to any person
because of race, color, religion, national origin, or sex, except nothing
shall be construed to deny a deduction for amounts paid to any religious
or denominational club, group, or establishment or any organization
operated solely for charitable or educational purposes which restricts
membership to persons of the same religion or denomination in order to
promote the religious principles for which it is established and
maintained;
6. Any deduction prohibited by KRS 141.205; and
7. Any dividends-paid deduction of any captive real estate investment
trust; and
(d) 1. A deferred tax deduction in an amount computed in accordance with this
paragraph.
2. For purposes of this paragraph:
a. "Net deferred tax asset" means that deferred tax assets exceed the
deferred tax liabilities of the combined group, as computed in
accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the
Page 15 of 18
XXXX 1/13/2026 9:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1276
United States of America; and
b. "Net deferred tax liability" means deferred tax liabilities that
exceed the deferred tax assets of a combined group as defined in
KRS 141.202, as computed in accordance with accounting
principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
3. Only publicly traded companies, including affiliated corporations
participating in the filing of a publicly traded company's financial
statements prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally
accepted in the United States of America, as of January 1, 2019, shall be
eligible for this deduction.
4. If the provisions of KRS 141.202 result in an aggregate increase to the
member's net deferred tax liability, an aggregate decrease to the
member's net deferred tax asset, or an aggregate change from a net
deferred tax asset to a net deferred tax liability, the combined group
shall be entitled to a deduction, as determined in this paragraph.
5. For ten (10) years beginning with the combined group's first taxable
year beginning on or after January 1, 2026, a combined group shall be
entitled to a deduction from the combined group's entire net income
equal to one-tenth (1/10) of the amount necessary to offset the increase
in the net deferred tax liability, decrease in the net deferred tax asset, or
aggregate change from a net deferred tax asset to a net deferred tax
liability. The increase in the net deferred tax liability, decrease in the net
deferred tax asset, or the aggregate change from a net deferred tax asset
to a net deferred tax liability shall be computed based on the change that
would result from the imposition of the combined reporting requirement
under KRS 141.202, but for the deduction provided under this paragraph
as of June 27, 2019.
Page 16 of 18
XXXX 1/13/2026 9:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1276
6. The deferred tax impact determined in subparagraph 5. of this paragraph
shall be converted to the annual deferred tax deduction amount, as
follows:
a. The deferred tax impact determined in subparagraph 5. of this
paragraph shall be divided by the tax rate determined under KRS
141.040;
b. The resulting amount shall be further divided by the
apportionment factor determined by KRS 141.120 or 141.121 that
was used by the combined group in the calculation of the deferred
tax assets and deferred tax liabilities as described in subparagraph
5. of this paragraph; and
c. The resulting amount represents the total net deferred tax
deduction available over the ten (10) year period as described in
subparagraph 5. of this paragraph.
7. The deduction calculated under this paragraph shall not be adjusted as a
result of any events happening subsequent to the calculation, including
but not limited to any disposition or abandonment of assets. The
deduction shall be calculated without regard to the federal tax effect and
shall not alter the tax basis of any asset. If the deduction under this
section is greater than the combined group's entire Kentucky net income,
any excess deduction shall be carried forward and applied as a deduction
to the combined group's entire net income in future taxable years until
fully utilized.
8. Any combined group intending to claim a deduction under this
paragraph shall file a statement with the department on or before July 1,
2019. The statement shall specify the total amount of the deduction
which the combined group claims on the form, including calculations
Page 17 of 18
XXXX 1/13/2026 9:12 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1276
and other information supporting the total amounts of the deduction as
required by the department. No deduction shall be allowed under this
paragraph for any taxable year, except to the extent claimed on the
timely filed statement in accordance with this paragraph.
Section 4. Section 1 of this Act may be cited as the Kentucky Transactional
Gold and Silver Act.
Page 18 of 18
XXXX 1/13/2026 9:12 AM Jacketed